Hawaii statutes.
§712-1222 Promoting gambling in the second
degree. (1) A person commits the offense of promoting gambling in the
second degree if the person knowingly advances or profits from gambling
activity.

(2) Promoting gambling in the second degree is
a misdemeanor. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1973, c 201, pt of §1; am L 1987, c
83, §2; gen ch 1992]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next